Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1003.
do enact as follows:AB1003,11Section 1. 115.31 (1) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB1003,2,32115.31 (1) (d) “Surrender” means that an individual voluntarily relinquishes 3a license issued by the department for a minimum amount of time.AB1003,24Section 2. 115.31 (2r) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB1003,2,75115.31 (2r) (d) The state superintendent may not reinstate a license that is 6surrendered by an individual during an investigation for immoral conduct under 7sub. (2s).AB1003,38Section 3. 115.31 (2s) of the statutes is created to read:AB1003,3,39115.31 (2s) (a) If the department investigates a licensee for having engaged in 10immoral conduct or in response to a report made about a licensee under sub. (3) (a) 113. or 4., the state superintendent may not end the investigation without making a 12finding on whether to proceed with revocation or terminate a subsequent revocation 1hearing unless the licensee surrenders the licensee’s license permanently and 2waives the licensee’s rights to appeal that are related to the investigation of the 3license and revocation proceedings.AB1003,3,74(b) Whenever a licensee surrenders a license under par. (a), the department 5shall post on its website the name of the individual who surrendered the license, 6that the surrender is permanent, and that the surrender occurred during an 7investigation for immoral conduct.AB1003,48Section 4. 115.31 (6d) of the statutes is created to read:AB1003,3,119115.31 (6d) Beginning on the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts 10date], the state superintendent may not enter into an agreement that does any of 11the following:AB1003,3,1312(a) Has the effect of suppressing or destroying information relating to an 13investigation of immoral conduct by a licensee.AB1003,3,1814(b) Requires the state superintendent or the department to expunge from 15documents maintained by the state superintendent or department or to keep 16confidential information about allegations or findings of immoral conduct by a 17licensee, unless after investigation the allegations are found to be false or not 18substantiated.AB1003,519Section 5. 115.31 (6g) of the statutes is created to read:AB1003,4,220115.31 (6g) If the result of an investigation of a licensee for immoral conduct 21is revocation or that the licensee surrenders a license under sub. (2s), and a request 22is made under s. 19.35 for records related to the investigation, the department shall 23provide records related to the investigation to the requester by no later than 14 days 1after the department receives the request. The limitation to access under s. 19.36 2(10) does not apply to a request made under this subsection.AB1003,4,33